Maryland, session 2025, SB0999.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
13–102.
This title applies only in Baltimore County.
13–1601.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0999*

SENATE BILL 999
(a) (1) Except as provided in [subsection] SUBSECTIONS (b) AND (C) of this
section, the Board may not issue a license for an establishment that is within 300 feet of a
place of worship or school.
(2) The distance from the establishment to the place of worship or school is
to be measured from the nearest point of the building of the establishment to the nearest
point of the building of the place of worship or school.
(b) The prohibition against issuing a license in subsection (a) of this section does
not apply to:
(1) the renewal or transfer of a license of an establishment if, after issuance
of the license, a place of worship or school was built within 300 feet of the establishment;
(2) the issuance of a temporary license;
(3) a transfer that moves the licensed premises within the same building;
(4) a transfer of ownership of the licensed premises;
(5) the renewal of a Class B beer, wine, and liquor (on–sale) license or a
7–day Class BDR (deluxe restaurant) (on–sale) beer, wine, and liquor license, if the licensed
premises has a seating capacity of more than 50 individuals and is within a town center; or
(6) the transfer, conversion, and issuance of a license under § 13–1710 of
this title.
(C) THE PROHIBITION AGAINST ISSUING A LICENSE IN SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO THE ISSUANCE OF A BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR
LICENSE FOR ON– OR OFF–PREMISES CONSUMPTION FOR AN ESTABLISHMENT THAT
IS WITHIN 300 FEET OF A PLACE OF WORSHIP IF:
(1) THE ESTABLISHMENT IS LOCATED IN THE TOWSON AREA, AS
DETERMINED BY THE BOARD;
(2) THE ESTABLISHMENT IS LOCATED IN AN OFFICE BUILDING THAT
IS AT LEAST 100,000 SQUARE FEET IN SIZE;
(3) THE ESTABLISHMENT HAS A ZONING CLASSIFICATION OF
BM–D.T. BY THE COUNTY GOVERNMENT;
(4) THE PLACE OF WORSHIP CONSENTS IN WRITING TO THE ISSUANCE
OF THE LICENSE; AND

SENATE BILL 999 3
(5) (I) THE LICENSE IS TO APPLY TO A RESTAURANT, A MARKET, OR
ANOTHER SIMILAR ESTABLISHMENT; AND
(II) THE LICENSE IS NOT A CLASS A LICENSE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.